North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 2. Administrative Dissolution.

§ 55A-14-20.
Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under

G.S. 55A-14-21

to dissolve administratively a corporation if:

The corporation does not pay within 60 days after they are due any penalties, fees, or other payments due under this Chapter;

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 539, s. 24, effective July 29, 1995.

The corporation is without a registered agent or registered office in this State for 60 days or more;

The corporation does not notify the Secretary of State within 60 days that its registered agent or registered office has been changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued;

The corporation’s period of duration stated in its articles of incorporation expires;

The corporation knowingly fails or refuses to answer truthfully and fully within the time prescribed in this Chapter interrogatories propounded by the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter; or

The corporation does not designate the address of its principal office with the Secretary of State or does not notify the Secretary of State within 60 days that the principal office has changed.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 539, ss. 24, 25.

North Carolina Commentary

The prior law did not provide for administrative dissolution.

§ 55A-14-21.
Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.

If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under

G.S. 55A-14-20

for dissolving a corporation, the Secretary of State shall mail the corporation written notice of the Secretary of State’s determination.

If the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within 60 days after notice is mailed, the Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and mail a copy to the corporation.

The provisions of

G.S. 55A-14-06

, [G.S.] 55A-14-07, and [G.S.] 55A-14-08 apply to a corporation administratively dissolved.

The administrative dissolution of a corporation does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-14-22.
Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

A corporation administratively dissolved under

G.S. 55A-14-21

may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement. The application shall:

Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of its administrative dissolution; and

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated.

(a1)

If, at the time the corporation applies for reinstatement, the name of the corporation is not distinguishable from the name of another entity authorized to be used under

G.S. 55D-21

, then the corporation must change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name of the other entity before the Secretary of State may prepare a certificate of reinstatement.

If the Secretary of State determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section, that the information is correct, and that the name of the corporation complies with

G.S. 55D-21

and any other applicable section, the Secretary of State shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites the Secretary of State’s determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and mail a copy to the corporation.

When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution and the corporation resumes carrying on its activities as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred, subject to the rights of any person who reasonably relied to his prejudice upon the certificate of dissolution.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 17, s. 15.1(d); 1997-485, s. 2; 2001-390, s. 9; 2001-413, ss. 7.2, 7.3.

§ 55A-14-23.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the Secretary of State denies a corporation’s application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the Secretary of State shall serve the corporation under

G.S. 55D-33

with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the Superior Court of Wake County within 30 days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The appeal is commenced by filing a petition with the court and with the Secretary of State requesting the court to set aside the dissolution. The petition shall have attached to it copies of the Secretary of State’s certificate of dissolution, the corporation’s application for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State’s notice of denial. No service of process on the Secretary of State is required except for the filing of the petition as set forth in this subsection. The appeal to the superior court shall be determined by a judge of the superior court upon such further evidence, notice, and opportunity to be heard, if any, as the court may deem appropriate under the circumstances. The corporation shall have the burden of establishing that it is entitled to reinstatement.

Upon consideration of the petition and any response made by the Secretary of State, the court may, prior to entering final judgment, order the Secretary of State to reinstate the dissolved corporation or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2001-358, ss. 5A(c), 48(e); 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 55A-14-24.
Inapplicability of Administrative Procedure Act.

The Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to any proceeding or appeal provided for in

G.S. 55A-14-20

through

G.S. 55A-14-23

.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§§ 55A-14-25 through 55A-14-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.